src/morphology/stems/new_adverbs.lexc
LEXICON AV_GATEWAY
AV ; 
AV_TEMPORAL ; 

LEXICON AV_TEMPORAL
wasniibnong    AV_TAG    " 1 the summer before last" ; !Rand key:n103000756198n
wasi-bboonong    AV_TAG    " 1 the year before last, the winter before last" ; !Rand key:n103000756171n
gchi-gbegiizhik    AV_TAG    " 1 the entire day, the whole day" ; !Rand key:n103000560735n
gbe-naagshik    AV_TAG    " 1 all evening" ; !Rand key:n103004118924n
gbe-naagshi    AV_TAG    " 1 all evening" ; !Rand key:n103004118920n
papiichin    AV_TAG    " 1 at intervals, from time to time, intermittently, periodically" ; !Rand key:n103004166935n
ooswaabang    AV_TAG    " 1 the day after tomorrow" ; !Rand key:n103004166604n
oosnaago    AV_TAG    " 1 the day before yesterday" ; !Rand key:n103004166600n
oosi-bboonong    AV_TAG    " 1 the year before last, the winter before last" ; !Rand key:n103004166591n
nwenzh    AV_TAG    " 1 a long time, for a long time" ; !Rand key:n103004166438n
shkwaaj    AV_TAG    " 1 last [in a sequence], last time" ; !Rand key:n103000744658n
shki-naagshik    AV_TAG    " 1 in the early evening" ; !Rand key:n103000744539n
nowenzh    AV_TAG    " 1 for a long time" ; !Rand key:n103000714207n
nomya    AV_TAG    " 1 a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n103000713698n
namye    AV_TAG    " 1 a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n103000696435n
namya    AV_TAG    " 1 a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n103000696430n
mno-aapii    AV_TAG    " 1 at intervals, from time to time, intermittently, periodically" ; !Rand key:n103000680380n
mni-aapii    AV_TAG    " 1 at intervals, from time to time, intermittently, periodically" ; !Rand key:n103000680161n
mneyaapii    AV_TAG    " 1 at the right time" ; !Rand key:n103000680134n
biichin    AV_TAG    " 1 at intervals, from time to time, intermittently, periodically" ; !Rand key:n102995996639n


LEXICON AV_TAG
+Adv:0 CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 

LEXICON AV
nso-giizis    AV_TAG    " 1 three months" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdc03a8426dbb6823320a01dd02n
niizhgiizis    AV_TAG    " 1 two months" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb1ec8470cbc5323320a01dd02n
niiwgiizis    AV_TAG    " 1 four months" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb0e44438f930a23320a01dd02n
ngo-giizis    AV_TAG    " 1 one month" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb558c4d0c9eba23320a01dd02n
ni-nshwaas-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in eight months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711736n
ni-niizhwaas-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in seven months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711731n
ni-niizh-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in two months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711726n
ni-niiw-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in four months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711722n
ni-ngodwaas-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in six months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711700n
ni-naan-giizsagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in five months’ time" ; !Rand key:n103000711695n
nensooshkin    AV_TAG    " 1 three bags each" ; !Rand key:n103000711472n
neniizhooshkin    AV_TAG    " 1 two bags each" ; !Rand key:n103000711463n
neniiwooshkin    AV_TAG    " 1 four bags each" ; !Rand key:n103000711447n
nso-nam'e-giizhik    AV_TAG    " 1 three weeks" ; !Rand key:n103004166252n
ziibskaach    AV_TAG    " 1 slowly, not [doing] well" ; !Rand key:n103000788344n
zichkana    AV_TAG    " 1 all of a sudden, suddenly, swiftly, unexpectedly" ; !Rand key:n103000788304n
zhizhyaa    AV_TAG    " 1 straight (of road)" ; !Rand key:n103000787770n
zhimtooj    AV_TAG    " 1 probably" ; !Rand key:n103000787402n
zhigyak    AV_TAG    " 1 directly, the most direct way, straight" ; !Rand key:n103000780260n
zhigwayak    AV_TAG    " 1 directly, the most direct way, straight" ; !Rand key:n103000780255n
zhichkana    AV_TAG    " 1 all of a sudden, suddenly" ; !Rand key:n103000780097n
zhi-wiinge    AV_TAG    " 1 entirely, in its entirety" ; !Rand key:n103000780064n
zhawaach    AV_TAG    " 1 resemble somewhat, somewhat like, sort of like, sort of resemble" ; !Rand key:n103000779272n
zaagdawaak    AV_TAG    " 1 at the river mouth, at the baymouth" ; !Rand key:n103000768570n
zaagdawaa    AV_TAG    " 1 river outlet" ; !Rand key:n103000768566n
wewiikaa    AV_TAG    " 1 infrequently, seldom, sporadically" ; !Rand key:n103000756586n
wenj    AV_TAG    " 1 so, strikingly" ; !Rand key:n103000756344n
wendago    AV_TAG    " 1 virtually as if, be almost the case, be practically the case" ; !Rand key:n103000756331n
waawaaj    AV_TAG    " 1 even (indicating that something is surprising or extreme)" ; !Rand key:n103000755846n
waasnikekna    AV_TAG    " 1 on the far side of the road" ; !Rand key:n103000755795n
swekmigaak    AV_TAG    " 1 all over an area of ground" ; !Rand key:n103000745448n
sidaawendmaadkamik    AV_TAG    " 1 tragic" ; !Rand key:n103000745032n
shpamsagoong    AV_TAG    " 1 upstairs" ; !Rand key:n103000744982n
shkweyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 at the side, beside, on the side, at the end of a row" ; !Rand key:n103000744741n
shike    AV_TAG    " 1 alone, by oneself" ; !Rand key:n103000744412n
piinash    AV_TAG    " 1 until (in affirmative clauses)" ; !Rand key:n103004167196n
piidash    AV_TAG    " 1 until (in affirmative clauses)" ; !Rand key:n103004167175n
piichnaa    AV_TAG    " 1 now and then, once in a while" ; !Rand key:n103004167162n
penag    AV_TAG    " 1 less" ; !Rand key:n103004167077n
nwaakaming    AV_TAG    " 1 inland, in the bush, out in the country" ; !Rand key:n103004166417n
nsawiyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in the middle" ; !Rand key:n103004165515n
npaajnikeyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 on the opposite side, on the wrong side" ; !Rand key:n103004165207n
npaajnikekna    AV_TAG    " 1 on the wrong side of the road" ; !Rand key:n103004165201n
noondaa-naagosh    AV_TAG    " 1 partway through the evening" ; !Rand key:n103000714069n
nniizaan    AV_TAG    " 1 there seem to be a risk of something happening (expression of mild alarm at a risk)" ; !Rand key:n103000713443n
nnaasweyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in between" ; !Rand key:n103000713093n
neniidwikna    AV_TAG    " 1 on both sides of the road" ; !Rand key:n103000711442n
neniidweyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 on both sides" ; !Rand key:n103000711437n
ndaazhnikeknaa    AV_TAG    " 1 on this side of the road" ; !Rand key:n103000697321n
ndaaznikekna    AV_TAG    " 1 on this side of the road" ; !Rand key:n103000697316n
ndaasnikeyaa    AV_TAG    " 1 on this [closer] side" ; !Rand key:n103000697254n
namnik    AV_TAG    " 1 a fair amount, a moderate amount" ; !Rand key:n103000696425n
nakwayiing    AV_TAG    " 1 at the tip [of a stick or like object]" ; !Rand key:n103000696323n
naawkaakan    AV_TAG    " 1 in the middle of one’s chest" ; !Rand key:n103000696125n
naanomye    AV_TAG    " 1 a few moments ago, a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n103000695884n
naanomya    AV_TAG    " 1 a few moments ago, a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n103000695875n
naanaangodnong    AV_TAG    " 1 every so often, every now and then, sometimes" ; !Rand key:n103000695689n
naamoonak    AV_TAG    " 1 in the prow of a boat" ; !Rand key:n103000695619n
mtigwaakaag    AV_TAG    " 1 along the edge of the forest" ; !Rand key:n103000693963n
mnapapii    AV_TAG    " 1 from time to time, at intervals" ; !Rand key:n103000680013n
mna'aapii    AV_TAG    " 1 from time to time, at intervals" ; !Rand key:n103000679862n
mizi    AV_TAG    " 1 all, everything" ; !Rand key:n103000678948n
minjnikaang    AV_TAG    " 1 on one’s left, on the left side" ; !Rand key:n103000678928n
mijnikaang    AV_TAG    " 1 on one’s left, on the left side" ; !Rand key:n103000678829n
mekwaamtigwaaki    AV_TAG    " 1 forest" ; !Rand key:n103000677812n
megyak    AV_TAG    " 1 in the woods" ; !Rand key:n103000677803n
megwe-zapwaajiishkwak    AV_TAG    " 1 around in the deep mud" ; !Rand key:n103000677799n
megwemtigwaaki    AV_TAG    " 1 in the forest, in the woods" ; !Rand key:n103000677794n
megwaakwaak    AV_TAG    " 1 in the forest, in the woods" ; !Rand key:n103000677781n
mbanenik    AV_TAG    " 1 on one arm" ; !Rand key:n103000660439n
maamaazh    AV_TAG    " 1 carelessly, shoddily, sloppily, without much thought" ; !Rand key:n103000659517n
jiigshkwaandeming    AV_TAG    " 1 near the door" ; !Rand key:n103000645156n
jichkana    AV_TAG    " 1 all of a sudden, suddenly" ; !Rand key:n103000644712n
gtaamgomnik    AV_TAG    " 1 lots, enormous amount, huge quantity" ; !Rand key:n103000641947n
gnenzh    AV_TAG    " 1 a long time, long [in duration], for a long time" ; !Rand key:n103000620688n
gijnikaang    AV_TAG    " 1 on his right-hand side" ; !Rand key:n103000614799n
gichnikaang    AV_TAG    " 1 on the right, right-hand side" ; !Rand key:n103000581538n
geskaa    AV_TAG    " 1 suddenly, all of a sudden" ; !Rand key:n103000573346n
gadin    AV_TAG    " 1 forcefully" ; !Rand key:n103004118613n
eyedwi'iing    AV_TAG    " 1 at both ends, on both sides" ; !Rand key:n103004117617n
biindoonak    AV_TAG    " 1 inside the boat" ; !Rand key:n102996004203n
bemgii    AV_TAG    " 1 little by little, a little at a time, in small amounts, small amounts" ; !Rand key:n102995959266n
bebesha    AV_TAG    " 1 [objects have] small spaces between them, [objects be spaced] close together" ; !Rand key:n102995958101n
aazhoodenaang    AV_TAG    " 1 the other side of town" ; !Rand key:n102995940867n
aasmisbak    AV_TAG    " 1 ceiling" ; !Rand key:n102995939632n
aasmiyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 against the side of something" ; !Rand key:n102995939624n
aabtwaatik    AV_TAG    " 1 halfway up a pole or tree" ; !Rand key:n102995923940n
jaajaagena    AV_TAG    " 1 all sorts of [weird] ways, all sorts of [crazy] things" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdc7bb04502b48623320a01dd02n
npaajiyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 on the wrong side of something" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdc1f34410aa08523320a01dd02n
nikekna    AV_TAG    " 1 on a certain side of the road" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb32b442d8aa4223320a01dd02n
niisa'iing    AV_TAG    " 1 down below, downstairs" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb6558481796bf23320a01dd02n
mooshkin    AV_TAG    " 1 completely, fully, in full" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd8e8444092b69023320a01dd02n
